Hawaii statutes.
§197-5 General penalty. Any person
violating any of the provisions of this chapter, or any rule adopted pursuant
to this chapter, shall be guilty of a petty misdemeanor and upon conviction
thereof shall be punished as provided by law. [L 1985, c 74, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next